Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-373
Revenue administration; implementation of agreements and working relationships; state and federal agencies.

The Department of Revenue may develop and implement such agreements and working relationships which are consistent with the laws of the State of Nebraska with any federal office, state agency, or local subdivision of state government, either within or without the State of Nebraska which it may find necessary or desirable for proper administration of the tax laws of this state.

Laws 1965, c. 459, § 5, p. 1457;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 77-324;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 14.